Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,102
Standards of conduct for directors.

(MBCA 8.30) (a)(1) Each
member of the board of directors, when discharging the duties of a director,
shall act (i) in good faith and (ii) in a manner the director reasonably believes
to be in the best interests of the corporation.

(2) A director may, but need
not, in considering the best interests of the corporation, consider, among
other things, the effects of any action on employees, suppliers, creditors,
and customers of the corporation and communities in which offices or other
facilities of the corporation are located.

(b) The members of the board of directors or a committee
of the board, when becoming informed in connection with their decisionmaking
function or devoting attention to their oversight function, shall discharge
their duties with the care that a person in a like position would reasonably
believe appropriate under similar circumstances.

(c) In discharging board or committee
duties, a director shall disclose, or cause to be disclosed, to the other
board or committee members information not already known by them but known
by the director to be material to the discharge of their decisionmaking or
oversight functions, except that disclosure is not required to the extent
that the director reasonably believes that doing so would violate a duty imposed
under law, a legally enforceable obligation of confidentiality, or a professional
ethics rule.

(d)
In discharging board or committee duties, a director who does not have knowledge
that makes reliance unwarranted is entitled to rely on the performance by
any of the persons specified in subdivision (f)(1) or (f)(3) of this section
to whom the board may have delegated, formally or informally by course of
conduct, the authority or duty to perform one or more of the board's functions
that are delegable under applicable law.

(e) In discharging board or committee duties a director
who does not have knowledge that makes reliance unwarranted is entitled to
rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial
statements and other financial data, prepared or presented by any of the persons
specified in subsection (f) of this section.

(f) A director is entitled to rely,
in accordance with subsection (d) or (e) of this section, on:

(1) One or more officers
or employees of the corporation whom the director reasonably believes to be
reliable and competent in the functions performed or the information, opinions,
reports, or statements provided;

(2) Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons
retained by the corporation as to matters involving skills or expertise the
director reasonably believes are matters (i) within the particular person's
professional or expert competence or (ii) as to which the particular person
merits confidence; or

(3)
A committee of the board of directors of which the director is not a member
if the director reasonably believes the committee merits confidence.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 102.